Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 1 General Provisions

42-9-1.
Declaration of legislative policy.

In recognition of the doctrine contained in the Constitution of this state requiring the three branches of government to be separate, it is declared to be the policy of the General Assembly that the duties, powers, and functions of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles are executive in character and that, in the performance of its duties under this chapter, no other body is authorized to usurp or substitute its functions for the functions imposed by this chapter upon the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 210, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 42.

Cross references.

Composition and powers of State Board of Pardons and Paroles, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IV, Sec. II, Paras. I, II.

42-9-2.
Creation of board.

Pursuant to Article IV, Section II, Paragraph I of the Georgia Constitution, there shall be a State Board of Pardons and Paroles, which shall consist of five members appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation of the Senate.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1069, § 12; Ga. L. 1973, p. 157, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 500, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 867, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 500, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides as follows: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section II of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

42-9-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Board” means the State Board of Pardons and Paroles.

“Community supervision officer” means a person who supervises probationers or parolees for the department.

“Department” means the Department of Community Supervision.

“Split sentence” means any felony sentence that includes a term of imprisonment followed by a term of probation.

History.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-81/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions which read: “As used in this chapter, the term ‘board’ means the State Board of Pardons and Paroles.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-9-4.
Appointments to board when Senate not in session.

Appointments made at times when the Senate is not in session shall be effective ad interim.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 157, § 2.

42-9-5.
Compensation of board members.

The members of the board shall devote their full time to the duties of their office. Beginning July 1, 1999, the salaries of the members of the board shall be set by the Governor and their travel expenses and costs of lodging and meals shall be paid as provided in Code Section 45-7-20.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 3; Ga. L. 1947, p. 673, § 2; Ga. L. 1952, p. 6, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 42; Ga. L. 1999, p. 910, § 3; Ga. L. 1999, p. 1213, § 4.

42-9-6.
Board chairman.

Each year the board shall elect one of its members to serve as chairman of the board for the ensuing year.

The chairman shall draw no salary from the state in addition to that which he receives as a member of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 500, § 3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 689, § 1.

Cross references.

Manner of selection of chairman of board, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IV, Sec. II, Para. I.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 500, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides as follows: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section II of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

42-9-7.
Board quorum.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 6.

42-9-8.
Official board seal.

The board shall adopt an official seal of which the courts shall take judicial notice.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 5.

42-9-9.
Board employees; “disability” defined; awarding of badges.

The board may appoint such clerical, stenographic, supervisory, and expert assistants and may establish such qualifications for its employees as it deems necessary. In its discretion, the board may discharge such employees.

An employee leaving the service of the board under honorable conditions who has accumulated 20 or more years of service with the board, or 20 or more years of combined service as a parole officer with the board, a probation officer or supervisor with the Department of Corrections, or a community supervision officer with the department, shall be entitled as part of such employee’s compensation to retain his or her board issued weapon and badge.

As used in this subsection, the term “disability” means a disability that prevents an individual from working as a parole officer.

When a parole officer leaves the employment of the board as a result of a disability arising in the line of duty, such parole officer shall be entitled as part of such parole officer’s compensation to retain his or her weapon and badge in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the board.

A parole officer killed in the line of duty shall be entitled to have his or her board issued badge given to a surviving family member.

The board shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 9; Ga. L. 2008, p. 285, § 1/SB 502; Ga. L. 2013, p. 82, § 2/HB 482; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-82/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 608, § 4/SB 270.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted the former last sentence of subsection (b), which read; “The board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of this subsection.”, and added subsections (c) and (d).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective May 3, 2016, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a) and added subsections (b) through (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-9-9.1.
Assistance to law enforcement, correctional, or homeland security agencies; conferring powers of law enforcement officers by the board.

In order to assist in the preservation of peace, order, and security, governmental officials from law enforcement, correctional, or homeland security agencies of federal, state, or local governments may request assistance from the board. For the purpose of providing the requested assistance, a majority of the members of the board may confer all powers of a law enforcement officer of this state, including, but not limited to, the power to make arrests for violations of any of the criminal laws of this state, upon any person who is employed by the board and who is otherwise certified as a peace officer under the provisions of Chapter 8 of Title 35.

Before the board grants the powers of a law enforcement officer authorized in subsection (a) of this Code section, the board must find that extraordinary circumstances exist that necessitate additional law enforcement officers.

The time period for the law enforcement officer powers authorized in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be specified when the powers are bestowed, not to exceed 30 days.

While possessing the powers of a law enforcement officer authorized in subsection (a) of this Code section, the board employee shall be under the direction of the federal, state, or local government entity requesting assistance from the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-9-9.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1219, § 1/HB 289.

42-9-10.
Legal adviser of board.

The Attorney General shall be the legal adviser of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 7.

42-9-11.
Office quarters for board; supplies and equipment.

The board shall have office quarters in the state capital. Supplies, stationery, and equipment shall be provided for the board in the same manner as they are provided for other departments, boards, commissions, bureaus, or offices of the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 8.

42-9-12.
Appointment of replacement for incapacitated member; calling of appointing council by Governor; immunity of council from civil or criminal liability.

Whenever the Governor has personal knowledge or receives information deemed by him to be reliable that any member of the board, by reason of illness or other providential cause, is unable to perform the duties of his office, he shall call a council to be composed of the president of the Medical Association of Georgia, the president of the State Bar of Georgia, and the commissioner of public health for the purpose of ascertaining whether or not any member of the board is in fact unable to perform the duties of his office. In the event the president of the Medical Association of Georgia is disqualified or unable for any cause to serve on the council, he shall appoint some other member of the Medical Association of Georgia, preferably an elected officer therein, to serve in his place and stead; and he shall notify the Governor of his appointee. In the event the president of the State Bar of Georgia is disqualified or unable for any cause to serve on the council, he shall appoint some other member of the State Bar of Georgia, preferably an elected officer therein, to serve in his place and stead; and he shall notify the Governor of his appointee. In the event the commissioner of public health is disqualified or unable for any cause to serve on the council, the chairman of the Board of Public Health, if he is a physician licensed to practice under Chapter 34 of Title 43, shall serve in place of the commissioner. If both the commissioner and the chairman are disqualified or unable for any cause to serve on the council, the chairman shall designate a member of the Board of Public Health who is a physician licensed to practice under Chapter 34 of Title 43 to serve on the council. The chairman shall notify the Governor of his appointee.

The Governor shall inform the council, appointed pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, of the information which has caused him to believe that a member of the board is unable to perform the duties of his office. If the council or a majority thereof, after a full investigation and examination into the truth of such information, shall, in writing duly signed, find that a member is incapacitated to perform the duties of his office, the Governor shall execute an executive order relating such facts. The member shall thereupon be suspended from performing the duties of his office and the Governor shall appoint a person to perform the duties of such member of the board during his incapacity.

The person appointed to perform the duties of a member of the board shall give bond with good security as required of other members of the board, shall be given the same oath of office as other members of the board, and shall be issued a commission as a member of the board, which shall be effective so long as the person performs the duties of a member of the board. Upon giving the bond and taking the oath as required by this Code section, and upon being issued his commission as authorized in this Code section, the person shall be authorized to do everything, perform every act, and exercise every prerogative and discretion that any other member of the board might do, perform, or exercise under existing law.

The person appointed to serve as a member of the board in the place and stead of an incapacitated member shall be subject to the confirmation of the Senate, if the Senate is in session at the time of his appointment or convenes in session prior to the expiration of his appointment. Any such appointment made at times when the Senate is not in session shall be effective ad interim.

During the period of incapacity of a member of the board, the member shall be entitled to receive the compensation and such other benefits as may be provided by law or otherwise for members of the board.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the appointee may be an elected official, appointed official, or employee of this state. The order appointing the person to serve in the place and stead of any incapacitated member shall include his compensation. The compensation to be received by such person shall not exceed the compensation received by other members of the board.

No member of the council designated pursuant to this Code section shall be civilly or criminally liable for his actions and doings as a member of the council. This provision may be pleaded as an absolute defense in any civil or criminal proceedings relative thereto.

History.

Code 1933, § 77-502.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 729, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 42; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 42; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 1-5, 1-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, §§ 6-4, 6-5/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

42-9-13.
Reinstatement of incapacitated member upon recovery.

Whenever the Governor has personal knowledge or receives information deemed by him to be reliable that a member of the board who has been determined to be incapacitated to perform the duties of his office has overcome his incapacity, that his incapacity has been removed, or that his incapacity has ceased, the Governor shall call the council that previously examined the member of the board who was found to be incapacitated to perform the duties of his office or shall call a council comprised of the persons set forth in Code Section 42-9-12. Whenever the council has knowledge or receives information deemed by the members to be reliable that the member of the board who has been determined to be incapacitated to perform the duties of his office has overcome his incapacity, that his incapacity has been removed, or that his incapacity has ceased, the members may call themselves into session for the purpose of ascertaining whether or not the member of the board is in fact able to resume the performance of the duties of his office.

If the Governor calls the council, he shall inform the council of the information that has caused him to believe that the person is able to resume the performance of the duties of his office. If the council or a majority thereof, after full investigation and examination into the truth of the information furnished by the Governor or otherwise given to the council, shall, in writing duly signed, find that the incapacity of the member has ceased and that the member is capable of assuming the performance of the duties of his office, the Governor shall execute an executive order relating such facts. The member shall thereafter assume and perform the duties of his office and the term of the member of the board appointed to perform the duties of the previously incapacitated member shall terminate.

History.

Code 1933, § 77-502.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 729, § 1.

42-9-14.
Removal of board members for cause.

As used in this Code section, the term “committee” or “removal committee” means the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, and an appointee of the Governor who is not the Attorney General.

The removal committee is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations pertaining to the removal for cause of members of the board.

Rules and regulations promulgated by the committee may include, but are not restricted to, the procedures to be observed in removing members of the board for cause and determinations as to what conduct by a board member shall be cause for removal.

The removal committee is not an agency within the meaning of paragraph (1) of Code Section 50-13-2, and Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” shall not be applicable to the removal committee.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 727, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 500, § 4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 426, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 500, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section II of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

42-9-15.
Conflicts of interest by members or employees of board.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, no member of the board or full-time employee thereof, during his or her service upon or under the board, shall engage in any other business or profession or hold any other public office which business, profession, or office conflicts with his or her official duties as a member of the board or as an employee thereof; nor shall he or she serve as a representative of any political party or any executive committee or other governing body thereof, or as an executive officer or employee of any political committee, organization, or association; nor shall he or she be engaged on the behalf of any candidate for public office in the solicitation of votes or otherwise become a candidate for public office, without resigning from the board or from employment by the board.

Except as provided by subsection (c) of this Code section, an employee of the board shall not be required to resign from employment by the board if he or she becomes a candidate for a public office of a county, school district, or municipality which does not require full-time service or accepts appointment to such an office.

An employee of the board shall be required to resign from employment by the board if he or she becomes a candidate for the General Assembly or becomes a candidate for or accepts appointment to a public office which requires full-time service.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 556, § 1.

42-9-16.
Persons permitted to appear or practice before board for remuneration generally.

Only duly licensed attorneys who are active members in good standing of the State Bar of Georgia shall be permitted to appear or practice in any matter before the board for a fee, money, or other remuneration.

Any person who pays or receives any fee, money, or other remuneration in violation of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 1193, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article discussing areas in which attorneys may represent clients before the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, see 13 Ga. St. B.J. 46 (1976).

42-9-17.
Appearance before board by members of General Assembly or other elected or appointed officials on behalf of persons under the jurisdiction of the board.

It shall be unlawful for members of the General Assembly or any other state elected or appointed official to accept any compensation for appearing before the board in behalf of a person under the jurisdiction of the board and for seeking a decision on behalf of the person. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed so as to prohibit:

Members of the General Assembly or state elected or appointed officials from appearing before the board when their official duties require them to do so; or

Members of the General Assembly or state elected or appointed officials from requesting information from and presenting information to the board on behalf of constituents when no compensation, gift, favor, or anything of value is accepted, either directly or indirectly, for such services.

Nothing in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be construed to apply to the acceptance of compensation, expenses, and allowances received by members of the General Assembly or any other state elected or appointed official for their duties as such members or officials.

Any person who violates subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 471, §§ 1-3.

42-9-18.
Maintenance of records of persons contacting members of board on behalf of inmates.

The board shall maintain a complete written record of every person contacting any member of the board on behalf of an inmate. The record shall be indexed and a copy of the record shall be placed in the inmate’s file. The record shall include the name and address of the person contacting the board member and the reason for contacting the board member.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 1193, § 2.

42-9-19.
Annual report of board.

On or before January 1 of each year, the board shall make a written report of its activities, copies of which shall be sent to the Governor, the Attorney General, each body of the General Assembly, and to such other officers and persons as the board may deem advisable. One copy of the report shall become a part of the records of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 24; Ga. L. 1983, p. 500, § 5; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 42; Ga. L. 1984, p. 689, § 2.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 500, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section II of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

42-9-20.
General duties of board.

In all cases in which the chairperson of the board or any other member designated by the board has suspended the execution of a death sentence to enable the full board to consider and pass on same, it shall be mandatory that the board act within a period not exceeding 90 days from the date of the suspension order. In the cases which the board has power to consider, the board shall be charged with the duty of determining which inmates serving sentences imposed by a court of this state may be released on pardon or parole and fixing the time and conditions thereof. The board shall also be charged with the duty of determining violations of parole and taking action with reference thereto and making such investigations as may be necessary. It shall be the duty of the board personally to study the cases of those inmates whom the board has power to consider so as to determine their ultimate fitness for such relief as the board has power to grant. The board by an affirmative vote of a majority of its members shall have the power to commute a sentence of death to one of life imprisonment.

The board shall provide The Council of Superior Court Clerks of Georgia the data set forth in Code Section 15-12-40.1, without charge and in the electronic format requested.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 11; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1294, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 42; Ga. L. 1983, p. 500, § 6; Ga. L. 2014, p. 451, § 14/HB 776; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-83/HB 310.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a) and added subsection (b).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (a), substituted “chairperson” for “chairman” near the beginning and substituted “of determining violations of parole and taking action with reference thereto and making such investigations as may be necessary” for “of supervising all persons placed on parole, of determining violations thereof and of taking action with reference thereto, of making such investigations as may be necessary, and of aiding parolees or probationers in securing employment” near the middle. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Cross references.

Powers of State Board of Pardons and Paroles, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IV, Sec. II, Para. II.

Authority of Governor to suspend execution of death sentences, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. II, Para. II and §

42-9-56

.

Imposition and review of death penalty generally, §

17-10-30

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 500, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section II of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-9-20.1.
Public access to information regarding paroled felons residing within state.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50 or any provisions of this chapter relating to the confidentiality of records, the State Board of Pardons and Paroles shall develop and implement a system whereby any interested citizen of this state shall be permitted to contact the board through an electronic calling system or by other means and receive information relating to persons who have been convicted of a felony, who have been paroled, and whose current addresses are within the State of Georgia. With respect to each parolee, the board shall provide the parolee’s name, sex, date of birth, current address, crime or crimes for which the parolee was convicted, and the beginning and ending dates of such person’s parole. The board shall be authorized to charge a reasonable fee to cover the costs of providing such information. The board shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-9-20.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 915, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 207, § 2/HB 71.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted the former third sentence, which read: “The board shall not release any information regarding a person who has previously been paroled and whose civil rights have been restored.”

42-9-21.
Supervision of persons placed on parole or other conditional release; contracts for services and programs; collection of sums for restitution.

The department shall have the function and responsibility of supervising all persons placed on parole or other conditional release by the board.

The department shall be authorized to maintain and operate or to enter into memorandums of agreement or other written documents evidencing contracts with other state agencies, persons, or any other entities for transitional or intermediate or other services or for programs deemed by the board to be necessary for parolees or others conditionally released from imprisonment by order of the board and to require as a condition of relief that the offender pay directly to the provider a reasonable fee for such services or programs.

In all cases where restitution is applicable, the department shall collect during the parole period those sums determined to be owed to the victim.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1209, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3221, § 9; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1376, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-84/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsections (a) and (c), substituted “department” for “board”; and, in subsection (b), substituted “department shall be” for “board is” and “memorandums” for “memoranda” near the beginning, and substituted “such” for “said” near the end. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-91/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-9-21.1.
[Repealed] Compensation of board employee injured by inmate or parolee.

History.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 1113, § 2. For current provisions regarding compensation of board employees injured in the line of duty by an act of external violence, see Code Section 45-7-9; repealed by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1491, § 3, effective July 1, 1986.

42-9-22.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be liberally construed so that its purpose may be achieved.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 28.